Massachusetts, session 194th, H4834.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after 
section 248 the following section:  
Section 249. (a) As used in this section, the following words shall have the following 
meaning unless the context clearly requires otherwise – “Medical Health and Fitness Facilities” 
(“MHFF”) are defined as any wellness facility that has created protocols and operating 
procedures which all such facilities will need to achieve and maintain in order to be recognized 
as such a facility by the department. 
(b) Medical Health and Fitness Facilities as recognized by the department must adhere to 
and achieve the following safety standards and facility specifications and requirements: 
1. Medical Application Standards: MHFF facilities must maintain, adhere to and 
provide for all of the following medical safeguards and medical service programs:  
a. Written policies and procedures regarding member/guest safety; 

of 6 13  b. Emergency response procedures; 
c. Individualized health and mental health assessments; 
d. Disease management and prevention programs; 
e. Lifestyle change/health-risk and chronic pain reduction programs; 
f. Physical therapy, post-operative/injury; 
g. Physical therapy continued care program; 
h. Implementation and maintenance of a Medical Advisory Board; and 
i.  A mental health referral program.  
(c) Medical Advisory Board (“MAB”) is group of healthcare professionals headed by a 
Medical Director that meet on at least a quarterly basis for the purpose of reviewing and 
providing professional oversight for all aforementioned medical applications:  The members of 
the MAB should be recognized experts in their field. Their combined experience and valued 
insights should direct the facility in all efforts to enhance all existing wellness programs as well 
as maintain and improve the safety protocols for current participants. The MAB also plays a 
large part in determining what new services and or lifestyle improvement programs may be 
needed or valuable to neighboring communities and the client/patient community. 
i. Medical Director 
i. The Medical Director is a licensed medical physician who sits on the 
Medical Advisory Board and oversees, directs and reviews all communications with the MAB. 

of 6 32             ii. The Medical Director is responsible for the safe and appropriate 
application of all medical programs within the facility. 
2. Staffing Requirements and Qualifications 
a. All MHFF facilities are required to employ personnel in the following full-time 
positions with qualifications listed. 
b. Fitness Director: must have a minimum of an Exercise Physiology or Health 
Science Degree or the equivalent. 
c. Certified Pool Operator: Facilities with pools and/or hot tubs and Jacuzzi must 
have a certified pool operator. 
d. Operations Manager: Must have a BS in Facility and or Operations Management 
with 5+ years’ experience.  
e. Fitness Manager on Duty (“FMOD”):  all facilities must employ a fitness manager 
on duty at all times of operation.  
f. Medical Director: All facilities must have a licensed medical physician to oversee 
the MAB. The Medical Director will be responsible for overseeing the medical and behavioral 
change programs within each facility. The Medical Director will work with the MAB and facility 
management in order to coordinate various interdisciplinary teams to execute the facility’s 
medical and wellness policies, systems and agenda. 
3. Cleaning and Hygiene Procedures: MHFF facilities must maintain and enforce the 
following cleaning protocols in accordance with the Massachusetts Safety and Standards 
Checklist 

of 6 53  a. Provide ample and sufficient sanitation wipes easily accessed for members and 
staff to clean equipment before and after each individual use. 
b. Provide ample and sufficient hand sanitation stations easily accessed for members 
and staff to consistently sanitize their hands. 
c. Staff is required to spray down equipment with EPA approved disinfectant at 
scheduled times throughout the day to maintain optimal safety and cleanliness. Staff must log 
and track cleaning times. 
d. Staff will disinfect high touch, high use areas consistently throughout the day, 
with EPA approved N list cleaning product and log and track times. 
e.  Increase cleaning staff to maintain and enable consistent, thorough and 
continuous facility sanitization. 
4. Air Quality and Control 
a.  MHFF facilities will be required to purchase, install and continuously operate non-
thermal plasma self-contained electronic air and surface decontamination unit(s) 
b.  Said unit(s) shall have the capacity to eradicate bacteria, viruses, mold and odor at an 
average reduction rate of 90% in the air and 95% on surfaces in large occupied spaces by 
creating oxidized molecules from ambient air using non-thermal plasma technology  
c.  Said unit(s) will not use chemicals in any aspect of operation and will comply with 
USDA National Organic Standards (7 CFR Part 205) 
d.  Said unit(s) shall be powered by standard 120 volt outlet 

of 6 73  e.  Said unit(s) shall have no effect on temperature or humidity of the facility  
f.  Said unit(s) shall offer continuous 24 hour treatment  
g.  Said unit(s) can be calibrated for different operations cycles 
h.  Said unit(s) shall be compliant with OSHA safety and air quality regulations. 
5. Safety Standards and Required Protocols: MHFF facilities will be required to 
implement and maintain the following protocols: 
a. Facilities must maintain an updated member contact process e-mail or cell phone 
b. Signs must be posted conspicuously throughout required spaces communicating 
safety regulations and requirements for said spaces. 
c. All new members are required to fill out a detailed health check form 
d. Automatic External Defibrillators (AEDs) are required; one unit for every 75,000 
sq. ft. to ensure prompt and timely application. 
e. All staff must be trained in CPR and AED use 
f. All staff must have basic lifesaving skill certification 
g. Facility must have and train all employees in an emergency action plan for the 
following: 
i. Fire 
ii. Health emergency 

of 6 91             iii. Active shooter 
iv. Positive COVID test 
v. Aquatic emergency 
h. A facility must track and document training times and trained personnel. 
SECTION 2. The department of public health shall produce an application and any 
necessary regulations. The department, within 150 days of receipt of the Medical Health and 
Fitness Facility application pursuant to this act, render a final decision denying or granting a 
certificate.  The department shall grant a facility a certificate to operate as a Medical Health and 
Fitness Facility pursuant to this act if, upon receipt of the application, if the department finds 
100 that: (i) the granting of such certificate would be consistent with the best interests of the public 
101 health, welfare or safety; and (ii) the facility is in compliance with the requirements of this act 
102 and applicable regulations.  A certification shall last for a period of 24 months from the date of 
103 receipt.